Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,334
Snowmobile operation; Game and Parks Commission; rules and regulations.

The Game and Parks Commission shall establish rules and regulations for:

(1) The operation of snowmobiles upon designated state-controlled or state-operated lakes within the State of Nebraska during the period of time when the lake is frozen and safe for the use of snowmobiles; and

(2) The operation of snowmobiles on established snowmobile courses or trails within public parks or on public land in this state owned or leased by the state.

Laws 1977, LB 230, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2012.01;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 430.